ru: Контекст единиц размеров инструмента: Длина ручки; Общие габариты инструмента; Длина одной пластины/бруска; Длина одной трубки; Габариты стойки/рамы; Другое
en: Instrument dimensions unit context: Handle length; Overall instrument dimensions; Single bar length; Single tube length; Stand/frame dimensions; Other
fr: Contexte des dimensions de l’instrument: Longueur du manche; Dimensions globales de l’instrument; Longueur d’une barre; Longueur d’un tube; Dimensions du support/cadre; Autre
cs: Kontext jednotek rozměru nástroje: Délka rukojeti; Celkové rozměry nástroje; Délka jednoho kamene (lišty); Délka jedné trubice; Rozměry stojanu/rámu; Jiné
sl-SI: Kontekst enote za dimenzije instrumenta: Dolžina ročaja; Celotne dimenzije instrumenta; Dolžina posamezne ploščice; Dolžina posamezne cevi; Dimenzije stojala/okvirja; Drugo
nl: Instrument afmetingen eenheid context: Lengte van handvat; Totale afmetingen van instrument; Lengte van enkele staaf; Lengte van enkele buis; Afmetingen van standaard/frame; Overige
ko: 악기 치수 단위 컨텍스트: 손잡이 길이; 전체 악기 크기; 단일 바 길이; 단일 튜브 길이; 스탠드/프레임 크기; 기타
bg-BG: Контекст на мерните единици на инструмента: Дължина на дръжката; Габаритни размери на инструмента; Дължина на единична пластина; Дължина на единична тръба; Размери на стойката/рамката; Други
pl: Kontekst jednostek wymiarów instrumentu: Długość uchwytu; Całkowite wymiary instrumentu; Długość pojedynczej sztabki; Długość pojedynczej rurki; Wymiary statywu/ramy; Inne
it: Contesto dell'unità di misurazione dello strumento: Lunghezza manico; Dimensioni complessive dello strumento; Lunghezza barra singola; Lunghezza tubo singolo; Dimensioni supporto/struttura; Altro
hr-HR: Kontekst jedinice dimenzija instrumenta: Duljina ručke; Ukupne dimenzije instrumenta; Duljina jedne šipke; Duljina jedne cijevi; Dimenzije stalka/okvira; Ostalo
es: Contexto de unidades de medida del instrumento: Longitud del mango; Dimensiones generales del instrumento; Longitud de una sola barra; Longitud de un solo tubo; Dimensiones del soporte/marco; Otro
da: Enhedskontekst for instrumentmål: Håndtagslængde; Samlede instrumentmål; Enkelt stanglængde; Længde på enkelt rør; Mål for stativ/ramme; Andet
vi: Ngữ cảnh đơn vị kích thước nhạc cụ: Chiều dài tay cầm; Kích thước tổng thể của nhạc cụ; Chiều dài một thanh (bar); Chiều dài một ống; Kích thước giá đỡ/khung; Khác
tr: Enstrüman ölçülerinin birim bağlamı: Sap uzunluğu; Genel enstrüman boyutları; Tek çubuk uzunluğu; Tek boru uzunluğu; Stand/çerçeve boyutları; Diğer
ja: 計器ディメンションユニットContext: ハンドルの長さ; 楽器全体の寸法; シングルバーの長さ; シングルチューブの長さ; スタンド/フレームの寸法; その他
th: บริบทของหน่วยวัดขนาดเครื่องมือ: ความยาวด้ามจับ; ขนาดเครื่องดนตรีโดยรวม; ความยาวแท่งเดี่ยว; ความยาวท่อเดี่ยว; ขนาดขาตั้ง/โครงสร้าง; อื่นๆ
sv: Enhetssammanhang för instrumentdimensioner: Handtagslängd; Instrumentets totala mått; Längd på enskild stav; Längd på enskilt rör; Stativ-/rammått; Övrigt
hu: Hangszer méretei - mértékegységek: Nyélhossz; A hangszer teljes mérete; Egyes rúd hossza; Egyes cső hossza; Állvány/keret méretei; Egyéb
nb: Enhetskontekst for instrumentdimensjon: Håndtakslengde; Instrumentets overordnede dimensjoner; Lengde på enkeltstang; Lengde på enkeltrør; Dimensjoner på stativ/ramme; Annet
fi: Soittimen mittayksikön konteksti: Kahvan pituus; Instrumentin kokonaismitat; Yksittäisen tangon pituus; Yksittäisen putken pituus; Jalustan/kehyksen mitat; Muu
sk-SK: Kontext jednotiek rozmerov nástroja: Dĺžka rukoväte; Celkové rozmery nástroja; Dĺžka jednej tyče; Dĺžka jednej trubice; Rozmery stojana/rámu; Iné
el: Μονάδα μέτρησης διαστάσεων οργάνου: Μήκος λαβής; Συνολικές διαστάσεις οργάνου; Μήκος μονής ράβδου; Μήκος μονού σωλήνα; Διαστάσεις βάσης/πλαισίου; Άλλο
zh-TW: 樂器尺寸測量對象: 握把長度; 樂器整體尺寸; 單條音板長度; 單管長度; 支架/框架尺寸; 其他
pt-PT: Contexto da unidade de medida do instrumento: Comprimento da pega; Dimensões totais do instrumento; Comprimento da barra individual; Comprimento do tubo individual; Dimensões do suporte/armação; Outro
de: Bezug der Maßeinheiten des Instruments: Grifflänge; Gesamtabmessungen des Instruments; Länge der einzelnen Stange; Länge des einzelnen Rohrs; Ständer-/Rahmenabmessungen; Sonstige
lt-LT: Instrumento matmenų vieneto kontekstas: Rankenos ilgis; Bendrieji instrumento matmenys; Vienos plokštelės ilgis; Vieno vamzdelio ilgis; Stovo / rėmo matmenys; Kita
pt-BR: Instrumento dimensões contexto de medida: Comprimento do cabo; Dimensões totais do instrumento; Comprimento de barra única; Comprimento de tubo único; Dimensões do suporte/estrutura; Outros
zh-CN: 乐器尺寸单位说明: 手柄长度; 乐器整体尺寸; 单根音条长度; 单管长度; 支架/框架尺寸; 其他
ro-RO: Contextul unităților de măsură pentru dimensiunile instrumentelor: Lungimea mânerului; Dimensiuni generale ale instrumentului; Lungimea unei singure bare; Lungimea unui singur tub; Dimensiuni stativ/cadru; Altele